Maine, session 132, LD918.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1605, sub-§3, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2
and affected by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
B. By the deposit of money or securities; or
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1605, sub-§3, ¶C, as amended by PL 2021, c. 254, §1, is
further amended to read:
C. For a corporation that is a transmission and distribution utility as defined in Title
35‑A, section 102, subsection 20‑B, by satisfying the Secretary of State that the
corporation has financial ability to comply with the requirements of this subchapter.;
or
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1605, sub-§3, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. For a qualifying religious organization, by meeting the requirements of section
1613.
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §1613 is enacted to read:
§1613. Self-insurance permitted for certain religious organizations
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Title to the contrary, the Secretary of State
may grant an exemption from any provision of this subchapter for any motor vehicle owned
or operated by a religious organization or its members subject to the following minimum
requirements.
1. Qualifying religious organization. In order to be eligible to self-insure under this
section, a religious organization must demonstrate with documentation to the satisfaction
of the Secretary of State that:
A. The religious organization has been recognized by the United States Social Security
Administration as an eligible religious group under Section 1402(g) of the United
States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and has filed Form 4029 with the
federal Internal Revenue Service;
B. The religious organization and its members operate 5 or more motor vehicles in this
State that are owned or leased by the religious organization or one of its members;
C. The religious organization and its members hold a common belief in mutual
financial assistance in time of need to the extent that they share in financial obligations
of members who would otherwise not be able to meet their obligations;
D. The religious organization and its members have met all of their responsibilities for
financial responsibility under this subchapter for the 2 years preceding its application
to self-insure under this section;
E. The religious organization is financially solvent and not subject to any actions of
bankruptcy, trusteeship, receivership or any other court proceedings in which the
financial solvency of the religious organization is at issue;
F. The religious organization and its members are not subject to any judgments arising
out of the operation, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle that have remained
unsatisfied for more than 30 days after final judgment was issued;
Page 1 - 132LR0891(01)

G. There are no factors causing the Secretary of State to believe that the religious
organization and its members do not have the financial ability to pay any future
judgments against them; and
H. The religious organization and its members meet any other requirements prescribed
in rules adopted in accordance with this section.
2. Requirements for self-insurance. Upon application under this section, the
religious organization shall file with the Secretary of State satisfactory proof in the form of
an irrevocable letter of credit from a qualified financial institution or the deposit of money
and securities as provided in section 1605, subsection 3, paragraph B and section 1605,
subsection 4 that the religious organization meets the following minimum requirements:
A. For 5 to 10 motor vehicles, the amount of the irrevocable letter of credit or deposit
of money and securities must be equal to a combined single limit of $250,000; and
B. For more than 10 motor vehicles, the amount in paragraph A must be increased by
$2,500 per motor vehicle.
Upon receiving an application in accordance with this subsection, the Secretary of State
may require a religious organization to submit a fee not to exceed $100 as established in
rules adopted by the Secretary of State pursuant to subsection 6.
3. Issuance of certificate of self-insurance. Upon demonstration that a religious
organization has met the requirements of subsections 1 and 2 and has paid any required
application fee, the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of self-insurance to the
religious organization. The certificate of self-insurance serves as evidence of financial
responsibility required by section 1605, subsection 2. Any member of the religious
organization may provide the certificate of self-insurance as evidence of financial
responsibility required by section 1605, subsection 2 to register a motor vehicle owned or
operated by that member.
4. Notice of withdrawal. A religious organization granted a certificate of self-
insurance under this section shall notify the Secretary of State in writing if any member of
the religious organization ceases to be a member within 10 days of that member's departure
or removal from the religious organization.
5. Termination of self-insurance. The Secretary of State may:
A. At any time after granting a certificate of self-insurance, terminate the authorization
for self-insurance if the secretary determines that the religious organization no longer
meets the requirements for self-insurance under this section. Notice of the termination
must be provided to the religious organization in writing at least 30 days prior to the
termination of the authorization; and
B. Terminate the authorization for self-insurance if the religious organization or its
members are subject to a judgment arising out of the operation, maintenance or use of
a motor vehicle and that judgment has remained unsatisfied for more than 30 days after
the final judgment was issued. The Secretary of State may hold deposited money or
securities until the judgment is satisfied.
6. Rules. The Secretary of State may adopt rules as necessary to implement the
requirements of this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical
rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Page 2 - 132LR0891(01)

7. Applicability. A certificate of self-insurance granted by the Secretary of State
pursuant to this section does not apply to:
A. A motor vehicle with a registered gross weight of 26,001 pounds or more or a motor
vehicle requiring its operator to hold a commercial driver's license;
B. An emergency vehicle;
C. A for-hire transportation vehicle for transporting freight or merchandise;
D. A for-hire transportation vehicle for transporting passengers;
E. A school bus; or
F. A rental vehicle.